District of Columbia statutes.
44-234

Agency fund.

(a)

There is established the Automated External Defibrillator Registration Fee Fund (“Fund”), as a non-lapsing, revolving fund, to be administered by the Mayor as an agency fund, as that term is defined in § 47-373(2)(I), and to be used exclusively for the purposes stated in § 44-232.

(b)

The Fund shall be financed through registration fees generated pursuant to § 44-232 and regulations promulgated by the Mayor.

(c)

The Fund shall be accounted for under procedures established pursuant to subchapter V of Chapter 3 of Title 47.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-278, § 5, 48 DCR 1869

History